Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Natural Gas

278.504.
Definitions for KRS 278.505 to 278.507.

As used in KRS

278.505

to

278.507

, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Intrastate pipeline” means any utility or any other person engaged in natural gas transportation in intrastate commerce, for compensation, to or for another person or to or for the public, but shall not include any part of any pipeline dedicated to storage or gathering or low pressure distribution of natural gas;

“Interstate pipeline” means any person engaged in natural gas transportation subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission under the Natural Gas Act or the Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978;

“Local distribution company” means any utility or any other person, other than an interstate pipeline or an intrastate pipeline, engaged in transportation or local distribution of natural gas and the sale of natural gas for ultimate consumption, but shall not include any part of any pipeline primarily used for storage or gathering or low pressure distribution of natural gas;

“Intrastate commerce” includes the production, gathering, treatment, processing, transportation and delivery of natural gas entirely within the Commonwealth which is not subject to the jurisdiction of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission under the Natural Gas Act or the Natural Gas Policy Act of 1978;

“Transportation” includes exchange, backhaul, displacement or other means of transportation; and

“Person” includes natural persons, partnerships, corporations, and two (2) or more persons having a joint or common interest.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 39, § 1, effective July 13, 1984.

278.505.
Transportation of natural gas in intrastate commerce by pipelines or local distribution companies with unused excess capacity.

The Public Service Commission may, by rule or order, authorize and require the transportation of natural gas in intrastate commerce by intrastate pipelines, or by local distribution companies with unused or excess capacity not needed to meet existing obligations of the pipeline or distribution company, for any person for one or more uses, as defined by the commission by rule, in the case of:

Natural gas sold by a producer, pipeline or other seller to such person; or

Natural gas produced by such person.

The rates and charges of any intrastate pipeline or local distribution company with respect to any transportation authorized and required under this section shall be fair and reasonable.

Nothing in this section is intended to relieve any intrastate pipeline of further obligations as a common carrier under KRS

278.470

,

278.480

, and

278.490

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 39, § 2, effective July 13, 1984.

278.506.
Gas to meet pipeline quality standards — Delivery and curtailment provisions.

All natural gas, authorized and required to be transported pursuant to KRS

278.505

shall:

Be of the same quality and meet the same specifications as that natural gas being purchased by the intrastate pipeline or local distribution company as contained in the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission tariff applicable to the intrastate pipeline or local distribution company’s natural gas supplier;

Be delivered to the intrastate pipeline or local distribution company by the person for whom the natural gas is to be transported at a point in the system technically capable of receiving gas at the proposed delivery rate and proper pressure;

Be transported pursuant to a written contract between the parties setting forth specific arrangements as to volumes to be transported, points of delivery, method of metering, timing of receipts and deliveries of gas and other matters relating to individual customer circumstances;

Not be transported if the performance of this service would detrimentally affect the ability of the intrastate pipeline or local distribution company to supply regular gas service to its customers;

Be subject to curtailment and interruption when in the judgment of the intrastate pipeline or local distribution company, said curtailment or interruption is necessary to enable the maintenance of deliveries to residential and other high priority customers or to respond to an emergency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 39, § 3, effective July 13, 1984.

278.507.
Public Service Commission’s policy to facilitate greater use of natural gas produced in Kentucky — Commission’s duties and prohibited activities.

It shall be the policy of the Public Service Commission to facilitate greater utilization of the natural gas produced or available for production within the state, where this can be done without detriment to the customers of utilities under jurisdiction of the commission.

This policy may be implemented by requiring the transportation of natural gas in intrastate commerce for persons who own or have purchased gas, as provided in KRS

278.505

.

The commission shall maintain at its offices for public inspection all rates and charges for natural gas transportation which are filed with the commission, and copies of federal or state rules which govern transportation of natural gas.

The commission may implement this policy by gathering and maintaining, for public inspection, various information concerning natural gas markets. Such information may include, but not by way of limitation:

Lists of producers of undedicated natural gas, together with such descriptions of available quantity, location or price as may be available to the commission;

Lists of persons seeking a supply of natural gas, together with such descriptions as may be available to the commission;

Sources of legal or technical expertise in natural gas procurement or marketing, which may be available to the commission;

Transportation contracts filed with the commission, except to the extent that the parties to such contracts have requested that portions of these contracts be treated as confidential.

The commission may adopt or develop model contracts or forms if it determines that such models would simplify negotiations between parties in the direct sale of natural gas.

The commission shall not implement this policy by engaging directly in the procurement or marketing of natural gas as an agent of any person.

The commission shall not regulate contracts between producers and purchasers of natural gas except to the extent that any party or parties to the contract are otherwise subject to commission regulation and commission review of contracts under this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 39, § 4, effective July 13, 1984.

278.508.
Exemption of sale of natural gas used as a motor vehicle fuel from regulation — Regulation of transportation, distribution, or delivery of natural gas used as a motor vehicle fuel.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, the rates, terms, and conditions of service for the sale of natural gas to a compressed natural gas fuel station, retailer, or to any end-user for use as a motor vehicle fuel, shall not be subject to regulation by the Kentucky Public Service Commission. Any utility provider of such a nonregulated service shall keep separate records and books of account adequate to allow the commission to allocate costs and revenues and to perform other acts that will assist the commission in enforcing this section.

The transportation, distribution, or delivery of natural gas to any compressed natural gas fuel station, retailer, or any end-user for use as a motor vehicle fuel, shall continue to be subject to regulation by the Kentucky Public Service Commission. Upon request by the utility, the commission shall set flexible rates which provide a fair opportunity to compete with other motor fuels. Price adjustment pursuant to these flexible rates are not rate changes for purposes of this chapter.

The sales or transportation transactions described in this section shall not adversely affect the regulated utility’s cost or costs, or the availability of natural gas to its utility sales customers.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 273, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.

278.5085.
Presumption of reasonableness of supply contract for natural gas produced from coal through gasification process.

If a gas distribution utility as defined in KRS 278.010(3)(b) enters into a twenty (20) year supply contract with any person for pipeline quality synthetic natural gas produced from coal through a gasification process, the commission shall find the transaction reasonable and shall allow the utility to recover the cost of the synthetic natural gas if:

The only coal used in the gasification process is coal subject to the tax imposed under KRS

143.020

;

The price per million British thermal units (BTU) is no greater than the long-term market price derived from the simple average of the Henry Hub monthly futures prices for natural gas as reported by the New York Mercantile Exchange (NYMEX) for the sixty (60) months immediately following the effective date of the contract, adjusted annually based upon the change in the Annual Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for the Midwest Region as published in April by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, or a suitable Consumer Price Index calculation if this Consumer Price Index is not available. The total price adjustment over the life of the contract shall not exceed one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per million BTU; and

The utility’s aggregate long-term supply contracts for the purchase of synthetic natural gas produced from coal through the gasification process do not exceed twenty five-percent (25%) of the annual system supply requirements of the utility, by volume, as measured in thousand cubic foot units (Mcf) at the time the utility enters into the contract.

History.

Enact. Acts 2006, ch. 55, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2006). A reference to “million cubic foot units (Mcf)” in subsection (3) of 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 55 has been changed in codification by the reviser of statutes to correct a drafting error to read “thousand cubic foot units (Mcf)” to conform with the U. S. Census Bureau’s Harmonized Commodity Description and Coding System which collects information based on the metric standard.

278.509.
Recovery of costs for investment in natural gas pipeline replacement programs.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, upon application by a regulated utility, the commission may allow recovery of costs for investment in natural gas pipeline replacement programs which are not recovered in the existing rates of a regulated utility. No recovery shall be allowed unless the costs shall have been deemed by the commission to be fair, just, and reasonable.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 148, § 2, effective June 20, 2005.